Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.200

Representation of persons charged with violating certain counterfeit substances, controlled substances, cannabis, or legend drug provisions.

(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of public defense may provide reimbursement of eligible expenses or contract directly with indigent defense providers for consultation and representation services for indigent adults facing pending charges or charged with violations of RCW 69.50.4011(1) (b) or (c), 69.50.4013, 69.50.4014, or 69.41.030(2) (b) or (c), or charged with offenses involving allegations of possession or public use of a controlled substance, counterfeit substance, or legend drug, in courts of limited jurisdiction in counties with a population of 500,000 or less and cities with a population of 200,000 or less. The county or city may enter into an agreement with the office of public defense for reimbursement of eligible expenses or designate the office of public defense to contract directly with indigent defense providers for consultation and representation services in their jurisdiction.

(2) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement to counsel at state expense or a right by counties or cities for the provision of services by the office of public defense that would exceed the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

[ 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 39.]